Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [120B.2413] COMPUTER SCIENCE PLAN GRANTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Plan development. new text end new text begin (a) The Department of Education must award competitive grants to school districts or charter schools that do not offer instruction in computer science to develop comprehensive computer science plans. A district or charter school must use grant funds to develop a plan that: new text end new text begin (1) describes how the district intends to incorporate computer science into curriculum or course offerings in kindergarten through grade 12; new text end new text begin (2) identifies supports needed to enhance computer science teacher capacity, skills, and learning; and new text end new text begin (3) identifies funding sources to sustain computer science offerings in future school years. new text end new text begin (b) A plan may include strategies to provide leadership training, curriculum enhancement, partnership engagement, or industry involvement to enhance computer science programs. new text end new text begin (c) A grant applicant must submit an application in the form and manner determined by the commissioner. A grant recipient must submit a plan to the department by June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Plan implementation. new text end new text begin (a) The Department of Education must award competitive grants to school districts or charter schools to implement computer science plans that meet the requirements for plans under subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (b) A grant applicant must submit an application in the form and manner determined by the commissioner, and must include a copy of the plan to be implemented. The department must prioritize grant awards for applicants that: new text end new text begin (1) have a plan that describes how the applicant will ensure every student in kindergarten through grade 8 receives instruction in computer science; new text end new text begin (2) have a plan that describes how the applicant will ensure computer science is offered to all high school students; or new text end new text begin (3) intend to use grant money to serve school sites that serve fewer than 500 students. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.187, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Computer science. new text end new text begin The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must adopt rules requiring all licensed teachers renewing their license under sections 122A.181 to 122A.184 to include in the renewal requirements professional development in foundational computer science concepts. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [122A.632] COMPUTER SCIENCE TEACHERS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Teacher preparation programs. new text end new text begin (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must award competitive grants to board-approved teacher preparation program providers to establish computer science teacher licensure programs or integrate computer science into existing teacher preparation programs that lead to initial or additional licensure. An applicant for a grant under this section must submit an application in the form and manner determined by the board. new text end new text begin (b) An application for a grant to add computer science to an existing licensure program must include: new text end new text begin (1) an initial plan for integrating computer science in grade level and subject areas aligned to state academic standards in science, mathematics, and other areas; and new text end new text begin (2) documentation of educator expertise in kindergarten through grade 12 computer science aligned to the computer science benchmarks in subject standards, a computer science license, or a plan for how teacher educators will gain that expertise. new text end new text begin (c) An application for a grant to establish a teacher preparation program that leads to licensure in computer science must include: new text end new text begin (1) a plan for submitting a request for initial program approval to the board; new text end new text begin (2) documentation of educator expertise in kindergarten through grade 12 computer science aligned to the computer science license or a plan for how teacher educators will gain that expertise; new text end new text begin (3) a plan for sustainability of the program after the grant period; and new text end new text begin (4) the number and demographics of teacher candidates impacted by the program. new text end new text begin (d) A teacher preparation provider that receives a grant under this section must report to the board on the computer science content being taught in teacher preparation programs and the number of teachers impacted. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Candidate support. new text end new text begin (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must develop a program to support teachers earning licensure in computer science through a portfolio or exam process. The board must also conduct a needs assessment to understand the feasibility of a microcredential to support licensure in computer science. new text end new text begin (b) The program of support must include: new text end new text begin (1) offering a course at no cost to teachers to prepare for a board-adopted assessment in computer science; and new text end new text begin (2) support for completing a portfolio to earn a license in computer science, including: new text end new text begin (i) a yearlong mentorship program; new text end new text begin (ii) quarterly meetings where applicants receive guidance on completing the portfolio process from a portfolio liaison with computer science content expertise, dedicated specifically to facilitating this program; new text end new text begin (iii) a stipend to cover substitute teachers when meetings take place during the school day; and new text end new text begin (iv) a waiver for all portfolio and licensure testing fees. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; COMPUTER SCIENCE IMPLEMENTATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Computer science plan grants. new text end new text begin (a) For grants to school districts or charter schools to develop or implement comprehensive computer science plans in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 120B.2413: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) Of this amount, $....... is for grants for plan development under Minnesota Statutes, section 120B.2413, subdivision 1, and $....... is for grants for plan implementation under Minnesota Statutes, section 120B.2413, subdivision 2. The department may retain up to ... percent to administer the grant. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; COMPUTER SCIENCE TEACHER GRANTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Computer science teachers preparation programs. new text end new text begin For grants to approved teacher preparation program providers in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 122A.632, subdivision 1: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Computer science teacher support programs. new text end new text begin To support a licensure pathway program for computer science teachers under Minnesota Statutes, section 122A.632, subdivision 2: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 20.. new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 20.. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Computer science teacher licensure incentive. new text end new text begin (a) To provide stipends of $1,000 per teacher to teachers newly earning a teaching license in computer science: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 20.. new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 20.. new text end new text begin (b) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end